Louisiana, session 2026, HB344.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:3412.1(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3412.1. Grain and Cotton Indemnity Fund; creation; assessment; rules and
regulations; suspension of assessment; eligibility for reimbursement;
availability of money; prorated claims; reimbursement for administrative
expenses; failure to pay; subrogation
* * *
E. Beginning on July 1st first following the fiscal year in which the balance
within the Louisiana Agricultural Finance Authority reaches a level of twelve
twenty-five million dollars, the commission shall suspend collection of the
assessment required by this Section. If after suspension of collection the balance is
less than ten twenty-two million dollars, the commission shall require collection of
the assessment. Any assessments collected after the balance reaches twelve twenty-
five million dollars, but prior to the suspension of collection, shall remain within the
Louisiana Agricultural Finance Authority.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 344 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.